District of Columbia statutes.
6-102.01

“Housing project” and “development” defined.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

The term “housing project” shall mean any low-rent housing (as defined in the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. § 1437 et seq.]), the development or administration of which is assisted by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(2)

The term “development” shall mean any or all undertakings necessary for planning, financing (including payment of carrying charges), land acquisition, demolition, construction, or equipment, in connection with a housing project, but not beyond the point of physical completion.

History

June 12, 1934, ch. 465, title II, § 201
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1188, ch. 691, § 5

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-102.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-111.
1973 Ed., § 5-112.

References in Text

The United States Housing Act of 1937, referred to in paragraph (1) of this section, is the Act of September 1, 1937, ch. 896.